test/src/morphology/N-сковорода_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - сковорода M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      сковорода+N+Fem+Sg+Nom: сковорода́
      сковорода+N+Fem+Sg+Acc: сковороду́
      сковорода+N+Fem+Sg+Gen: сковороды́
      сковорода+N+Fem+Sg+Loc: сковороде́
      сковорода+N+Fem+Sg+Dat: сковороде́
      сковорода+N+Fem+Sg+Ins: сковородо́й
      сковорода+N+Fem+Pl+Nom: ско́вороды
      сковорода+N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Inan: ско́вороды
      сковорода+N+Fem+Pl+Gen: сковоро́д
      сковорода+N+Fem+Pl+Loc: ско́вородах
      сковорода+N+Fem+Pl+Dat: ско́вородам
      сковорода+N+Fem+Pl+Ins: ско́вородами
